Louisiana, session 2026, HB1052.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:440.8 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§440.8. Confidentiality of records; child advocacy centers
The files, reports, records, communications, working papers, or videotaped
interviews used or developed in providing services under Part II of pursuant to Title
V of the Children's Code are confidential and not subject to the Public Records Law.
Disclosure of any files, reports, records, communications, or working papers of a
child advocacy center may be made only pursuant to Children's Code Article 525 or
by order of the juvenile court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to Children's Code
Article 412. Disclosure of videotaped interviews of protected persons shall be
disclosed either pursuant to R.S. 15:440.1 et seq. or Children's Code Article 322 et
seq.
Section 2. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(40) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1052 ENROLLED
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(40) Children's Code Articles 328, 328.2, 404, 412, 424.6, 424.9, 441, 525,
525.1, 543, 545, 615, 616, 616.1, 663, 737, 793, 888, 891, 893, 920, 921, 922, 1007,
1106, 1107, 1185, 1186, 1187, 1207, 1213, 1229, 1235, 1252, 1273, 1283.5, 1283.10,
1416, 1453, 1568
* * *
Section 3. Children's Code Article 513 is hereby amended and reenacted and
Children's Code Articles 525(C), 525.1, and 545(C) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 513. Confidentiality policy
A. A multidisciplinary investigative team may obtain all information
necessary to perform its official duties from any public agency, department, or other
organization, including material otherwise made confidential or privileged. Any
confidential or privileged material or verbal information obtained by a team member
during an investigation shall be disclosed only as necessary to other team members,
and shall not be disclosed to any agency or individual not represented on the
multidisciplinary investigative team unless otherwise required by law.
B. Each multidisciplinary investigative team shall adopt and adhere to a
written confidentiality policy governing information obtained in the course of child
abuse and neglect investigations. The policy adopted pursuant to this Article shall
ensure that information is shared only among authorized participants for the purposes
of investigation, assessment, prosecution, and treatment. All work product generated
by a multidisciplinary investigative team is subject to the protections provided in
Article 525.1.
* * *
Art. 525. Confidentiality policy; exceptions
* * *
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1052 ENROLLED
C. Each child advocacy center shall adopt and enforce a written
confidentiality policy consistent with state and federal law. Information maintained
by a child advocacy center is confidential and shall be disclosed only as necessary
to carry out the purposes of the center. All confidential information that is generated
or maintained by a child advocacy center is subject to the protections provided in
Article 525.1.
Art. 525.1. Confidential information of child advocacy centers and multidisciplinary
investigative teams
A. For the purposes of this Article, "confidential information" means any
files, reports, communications, records, materials, or information of any kind
created, received, or maintained by a child advocacy center or a multidisciplinary
investigative team in connection with a child abuse or neglect case, including but not
limited to forensic interviews, evidence, medical exams, advocacy notes, counseling
notes, mental health records, case review notes, communications, and
recommendations.
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, confidential
information is not subject to any public records requests, subpoena, discovery, or
disclosure except as provided in this Article.
C. Confidential information may be shared only as follows:
(1) Among multidisciplinary investigative team members for the purposes
of investigation, assessment, prosecution, and treatment.
(2) With a court of competent jurisdiction, subject to a protective order
issued pursuant to R.S. 15:440.1 et seq.
(3) As otherwise provided by law.
D. The provisions of this Article do not apply to criminal proceedings or
those proceedings governed by Titles VI, VII, and VIII of the Louisiana Children's
Code, which are subject to R.S. 15:440.5.
E. Confidential information other than forensic interviews is privileged and
protected from disclosure in child custody, civil, and administrative proceedings.
However, pursuant to R.S. 15:440.7, forensic interviews may be disclosed only for
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1052 ENROLLED
in camera inspection in connection with such proceedings. After in camera
inspection, the court may order in writing that the videotape be disclosed to the
attorneys of record for each party, subject to a protective order as provided for in
R.S. 15:440.7(A)(2).
F. The protections of this Article apply only to agencies and individuals
acting under formal multidisciplinary agreements.
G. Nothing in this Article limits the disclosure of independently obtained
evidence, the authority of law enforcement, or the constitutional rights of a
defendant.
* * *
Art. 545. Confidentiality
* * *
C. Information shared pursuant to this Chapter is confidential. The
confidentiality provisions of this Article include the protections provided in Article
525.1.
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.